Utah statutes.
76-8-904.   Permitting use of property for assembly advocating criminal syndicalism or sabotage.

The owner, lessee, agent, superintendent, or person in charge or occupation of any place, building, room, or structure, who knowingly permits therein any assembly or consorting of persons prohibited by the provisions of Section 76-8-903, or who after notification that the place or premises, or any part thereof, is so used, permits such use to be continued, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

